North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-04 Motor Vehicle Registration

39-04-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 439, § 2.

39-04-02.
Application for the registration of a vehicle — Contents — Penalty.

Application for the registration of a vehicle must be made as provided in this section:

Application must be made by the owner thereof using the legal name as evidenced by a valid state-issued driver’s license, identity card, or any other documentary evidence that confirms to the satisfaction of the director the true identity of the owner, upon appropriate forms approved or furnished by the department, and every application must be signed by the owner and must contain the owner’s county of residence, address, and a brief description of the vehicle to be registered, including the name of the maker, either the engine, serial, or identification number, if any, whether new or used, and the last license number known, and the state in which issued, and, upon the registration of a new vehicle, the date of sale by the manufacturer or dealer to the person first operating the vehicle. When two or more owners are designated, at least one of the owners must comply with the identification requirement in this subsection and all names used must be legal names. The application must contain other information as may be required by the department.

If the vehicle for which registration is sought is a specially constructed, reconstructed, or foreign vehicle, the facts must be stated in the application. The owner of every vehicle which has been registered outside this state shall exhibit to the department the certificate of the title and registration card or other evidence as will satisfy the department that the applicant is the lawful owner or possessor of the vehicle.

If the vehicle for which registration is sought is a new vehicle, no registration may be issued unless a certificate of origin executed by the manufacturer of such vehicle is attached to the application for registration or is attached to the application for the certificate of title for such vehicle. If the new vehicle for which registration is sought is of foreign manufacture, the certificate of origin must be furnished by the importer of such vehicle. The manufacturer or importer of all new vehicles shall designate the total shipping weight of the vehicle on the certificate of origin.

In applying for registration the buyer shall state the buyer’s post-office address and county and city or township of residence and the dealer shall make specific inquiry relative thereto before completing the application.

If the registration is for a semitrailer tank designated as MC306, MC307, MC312, MC330, MC331, or MC338, the applicant must show, upon request by an officer of the highway patrol, the status of compliance with hazardous material rules of the United States department of transportation or of this state. Violation of this subsection is punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, §§ 9, 30; 1933, ch. 160, §§ 4, 11; 1935, ch. 176, § 1; 1935, ch. 177, § 1; R.C. 1943, §§ 39-0405, 39-0467; S.L. 1947, ch. 257, § 1; 1955, ch. 244, § 5; 1957, ch. 250, § 1; 1957, ch. 259, § 1; 1957 Supp., §§ 39-0405, 39-0467; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1961, ch. 254, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, § 8; 1987, ch. 445, § 1; 2009, ch. 320, § 1.

39-04-02.1.
Change of address.

Whenever any person after making application for or obtaining the registration of a vehicle moves from the address named in the application or shown upon a registration card such person shall within ten days thereafter notify the department of the person’s old and new addresses.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 378, § 2; 2005, ch. 323, § 2.

39-04-03.
Size of tires to be given in application when truck, combination truck, or trailer registered. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 355, § 1.

39-04-04.
Register of applicants to be kept by the department.

The department shall file each application received, and when satisfied as to the genuineness and regularity thereof, and that the applicant is entitled thereto, shall register the described vehicle and the owner in books or electronic data processing files or on index cards or film as follows:

Under a distinctive registration number assigned to the vehicle and its owner, referred to in this chapter as the registration number.

Alphabetically under the name of the owner.

Numerically by the serial or identification number of the vehicle.

In the discretion of the department, in any other manner it may deem desirable.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 10; 1931, ch. 186, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 39-0407; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1981, ch. 378, § 9; 1987, ch 446, § 1.

39-04-05.
Grounds for refusing registration.

The department shall refuse registration or any transfer of registration upon any of the following grounds:

That the application contains any false or fraudulent statement or that the applicant has failed to furnish required information or reasonable additional information requested by the department or that the applicant is not entitled to registration of the vehicle under this chapter.

That the vehicle is mechanically unfit or unsafe to be operated or moved upon the highways.

That the department has reasonable ground to believe that the vehicle is a stolen or embezzled vehicle or that the granting of registration would constitute a fraud against the rightful owner or other person having valid lien upon the vehicle.

That the registration of the vehicle stands suspended or revoked for any reason as provided in the motor vehicle laws of this state.

That the required fee has not been paid.

When any sales tax or motor vehicle excise tax, properly due, has not been paid.

For failure to maintain security for payment of basic no-fault benefits and the liabilities covered under motor vehicle liability insurance on a motor vehicle as required by chapter 26.1-41.

For failure to provide proof of payment of the heavy vehicle use tax due, as required, to the internal revenue service.

When the vehicle is operating in violation of the provisions of the international registration plan, international fuel tax agreement, or the unified carrier registration plan.

When a motor carrier has been ordered out of service by the federal motor carrier safety administration.

The director shall promulgate rules and regulations for refusal of registration of vehicles not equipped as required by chapter 39-21.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 22; 1937, ch. 167, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 39-0408; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1971, ch. 356, § 1; 1975, ch. 265, § 21; 1975, ch. 326, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, § 10; 1985, ch. 317, § 66; 1987, ch. 447, § 1; 1991, ch. 401, § 1; 2005, ch. 324, § 1; 2007, ch. 337, § 1.

39-04-05.1.
Refusal to register vehicle — Revoking registration — Appeal.

If the department determines that an applicant for registration of a vehicle is not entitled to registration, it may refuse to register the vehicle. The applicant has no further right to apply for registration on the statements contained in the application unless the department reverses its decision or its decision is reversed by a court of competent jurisdiction.

The department may, after giving notice to the owner and an opportunity for a hearing, revoke the registration of a vehicle if it determines that the vehicle is not entitled to registration. The notice must be served in person or by registered or certified mail.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 378, § 3.

39-04-06.
When registration rescinded or suspended.

The department shall rescind or suspend the registration of a vehicle for any of the following:

When the department determines a vehicle is unsafe or unfit to be operated or is not equipped as required by law.

When the person to whom the registration card or registration number plates have been issued makes or permits any unlawful use of the same or permits the use thereof by a person or on a vehicle not entitled thereto.

When the department finds that a vehicle is registered in accordance with a reciprocity agreement, arrangement, or declaration and the vehicle is operated in violation of the agreement.

When the department determines that a motor vehicle is not covered by security for payment of basic no-fault benefits and the liabilities covered under motor vehicle liability insurance as required by chapter 26.1-41.

When the department is satisfied that the registration or registration card, plate, or permit was fraudulently or erroneously issued.

When a registered vehicle has been dismantled or wrecked.

When a registration card, registration plate, or permit is knowingly displayed upon a vehicle other than the one for which issued.

When the department determines that the owner has committed any offense under this chapter involving the registration or the registration card, plate, or permit to be suspended or rescinded.

When the purchaser or transferee of a vehicle fails to present the endorsed and assigned certificate of title to the department for transfer and make application for a new certificate of title within thirty days as required by section 39-05-17.

When the department determines a vehicle is operating in violation of the provisions of the international fuel tax agreement.

When a motor carrier has been ordered out of service by the federal motor carrier safety administration.

Any registration suspended for any of the above reasons must be restored upon compliance with the laws governing vehicle registration.

Whenever a check is returned to the department for want of payment the department shall rescind the registration of the vehicle covered by the check.

Any registration rescinded for want of payment of a check must be restored upon payment of the registration fee and a reasonable cost not to exceed twenty dollars for the collection of the check. If a returned check has a value exceeding one thousand dollars, the department shall also collect an additional fee of one percent of the value of the check.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 39-0409; S.L. 1953, ch. 235, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 39-0409; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 268, § 1; 1967, ch. 297, § 1; 1973, ch. 286, § 1; 1975, ch. 265, § 22; 1977, ch. 332, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 75; 1981, ch. 378, § 11; 1983, ch. 416, § 2; 1985, ch. 317, § 67; 1985, ch. 417, § 1; 1991, ch. 401, § 2; 1995, ch. 366, § 1; 2005, ch. 324, § 2.

39-04-07.
Department to suspend registration upon notice of theft or embezzlement.

Whenever the owner of any motor vehicle which is stolen or embezzled files an affidavit alleging either of such facts, the department immediately shall suspend the registration of such vehicle and may not transfer the registration thereof nor reregister the same until such time as it is notified that the owner has recovered such vehicle. Notices given as provided in this section are effective only during the current registration year in which given, but if during such year such vehicle is not recovered a new affidavit may be filed with like effect during the ensuing year. Every owner who has filed an affidavit of theft or embezzlement immediately must notify the department of the recovery of such vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 21; R.C. 1943, § 39-0410; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15.

39-04-08.
Number plates furnished by the department.

The department shall furnish to every motor vehicle owner two number plates for each registered motor vehicle, and one number plate for each registered motorcycle, trailer, or housetrailer. The department may, in its discretion, furnish only one number plate for each registered apportioned vehicle licensed under the international registration plan as authorized in section 39-19-04, truck tractor, or semitrailer.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 39-0411; S.L. 1955, ch. 241, § 1; 1957, ch. 251, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 39-0411; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1977, ch. 333, § 1; 1981, ch. 381, § 1; 1985, ch. 418, § 1.

39-04-08.1.
Assignment of motor vehicle number plates.

Motor vehicle number plates may not be assigned as a reward for any political activity, in recognition of any political affiliation or membership in any political party, or on the basis of political favoritism. However, an elected state office may be assigned a single or double digit number on a number plate as requested by that official. The department of transportation may adopt rules governing the assignment of numbers on motor vehicle number plates in accordance with this section.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 16, § 7; 1999, ch. 12, § 7; 2001, ch. 331, § 1.

39-04-09.
Director may design and issue number plates.

The director may design and issue plates of distinctly different color for each classification of motor vehicle, and there must at all times be a marked contrast between the background color of the plates and that of the numerals and letters on the plates. License plates must be acquired from the North Dakota state penitentiary if the penitentiary has the facilities to manufacture license plates. The director shall make a general issue during the biennium beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2015, and continuing into the biennium beginning July 1, 2015, and ending June 30, 2017.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 194, § 2, subs. e2; R.C. 1943, § 39-0412; S.L. 1957, ch. 251, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 39-0412; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1975, ch. 327, § 1; 1987, ch. 449, § 1; 2013, ch. 43, § 14.

Collateral References.

Improper use of automobile license plates as affecting liability or right to recover for injuries, death or damages in consequence of automobile accident, 99 A.L.R.2d 904.

39-04-09.1.
Commemorative Lewis and Clark number plates. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 12, § 6; 2001, ch. 331, § 8; 2005, ch. 323, §§
4, 5; 2015, ch. 260, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

39-04-10.
Special plates for amateur radio station licenseholders.

Owners of motor vehicles required to be registered under subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 of section 39-04-19, who hold an unrevoked and unexpired official amateur radio station license issued by the federal communications commission, Washington, D.C., may receive special plates. The plates will be issued upon application to the department, accompanied by proof of ownership of the amateur radio station license, compliance with the state motor vehicle laws relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles, and payment of the regular license fee, as prescribed under the North Dakota motor vehicle laws. The special plates will be issued in lieu of the plates ordinarily issued, and must have inscribed on them the official amateur radio call letters of the applicant as assigned by the federal communications commission.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 253, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-04121; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1973, ch. 287, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, § 12; 2005, ch. 323, § 3.

39-04-10.1.
Manufacturer’s plate — Fee.

A resident factory representative of any motor vehicle manufacturer may procure from the director a manufacturer’s plate, which must be designed by the director, for a fee of one hundred fifty dollars, which fee is for a twelve-month period. If such plate is procured at other than the beginning of the registration period, such fees must be prorated on a monthly basis. The procurement of such manufacturer’s plate by a factory representative is in lieu of the payment of any other registration fees, sales tax, or use tax on the motor vehicle used by the factory representative in the course of employment for the period for which the manufacturer’s plate is current and valid. The manufacturer’s plate may not be used by any person other than the representative to whom it was issued, nor may such plate be used on any vehicle other than that vehicle used by the factory representative in the course of employment. Upon the sale of the vehicle for which such manufacturer’s plate was issued, the plate must be retained by the factory representative and used upon replacement vehicles subsequently acquired from the manufacturer for use in the course of employment.

In addition to the foregoing provisions, a manufacturer of motor vehicles is entitled to use a manufacturer plate on its demonstration vehicles. Such plate must be issued in the name of the manufacturer and must be used solely for demonstration purposes only by the registrant or its designated employees.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 282, § 1; 1973, ch. 288, § 1; 1983, ch. 416, § 3.

39-04-10.2.
Special plates for mobility-impaired individuals.

The director may issue, without charge, upon application and payment of the regular license fee, plates marked with the international symbol of accessibility for the mobility impaired, to a motor vehicle owner possessing a parking certificate issued under subsection 4 of section 39-01-15. This section is not applicable to an applicant possessing more than one parking certificate issued under subsection 4 of section 39-01-15.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 408, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 43; 1989, ch. 319, § 3; 1993, ch. 376, § 2; 2019, ch. 304, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

39-04-10.3.
Personalized plates.

At the request of a registrant, the department may provide special license plates marked with not more than seven numerals, letters, or combinations of numerals and letters, upon application for a special license plate and payment of an additional fee of twenty-five dollars per registration period, unless the plate is a gold star license plate or a prisoner of war license plate, then there is no additional charge. A personal plate containing a restricted character may not be renewed. The department shall make the special license plates authorized by this section available for motor vehicles registered under section 39-04-10.6, trailers, travel trailers, and motorcycles. The fee for the special license plates issued under this section for vehicles registered under section 39-04-10.6 is a one-time fee of one hundred dollars. The special license plates for motorcycles may contain not more than six numerals, letters, or a combination of not more than six numerals and letters. In the event of sale or transfer of the vehicle, the owner shall remove the special license plates in accordance with section 39-04-36. Upon payment of the applicable transfer fee, the special license plates may be transferred to a replacement motor vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 378, § 4; 1985, ch. 419, § 1; 1989, ch. 450, § 1; 1991, ch. 402, § 1; 1993, ch. 378, § 1; 1995, ch. 367, § 1; 2013, ch. 284, § 1; 2019, ch. 307, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

39-04-10.4.
Antique motor vehicles — License and fee — Use.

Any motor vehicle which is at least forty years old may be permanently licensed by the department upon the payment of a registration fee of ten dollars. The department shall design and issue a distinctive number plate for this purpose. In lieu of the distinctive number plate, the owner of the motor vehicle may, at the discretion of the director, display on the motor vehicle a number plate from the year in which the motor vehicle was manufactured or in the case of military vehicles, military identification numbers. The number plate from the year of manufacture or military identification numbers may not be used in lieu of a distinctive number plate when it would create a duplication of a number in the recordkeeping system of the department. A number plate from the year of manufacture or military identification numbers must be legible and must be restored to the satisfaction of the department. Notwithstanding section 39-04-11, only one number plate needs to be displayed on a motor vehicle licensed under this subsection. Motor vehicles registered under the provisions of this section may not be used in the routine functions of a business or farming operation.

Any motor vehicle which is at least forty years old may, if not licensed under subsection 1, be permanently licensed using a personalized plate issued under section 39-04-10.3, in which case a one-time fee of one hundred dollars is due.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 378, § 5; 1985, ch. 420, § 1; 1989, ch. 451, § 1; 2009, ch. 321, § 1.

39-04-10.5.
Prisoner of war plates — Transfer to certain surviving spouses — Retirement.

On the death of a prisoner of war to whom was issued a special number plate under subdivision o of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18, the director shall comply with this section. If the deceased prisoner of war was survived by a spouse, the director shall transfer the number plate to that spouse’s name, and the spouse may retain the number plate as an active plate. If the surviving spouse remarries, then within thirty days of that remarriage, the surviving spouse shall surrender the plate to the director. On receipt of a surrendered plate, on the death of the surviving spouse, or if the deceased prisoner of war had no surviving spouse, the director shall retire the number used on the number plate. On retirement of a number plate and at the request of the survivors of the deceased prisoner of war, the director shall issue to the survivors one commemorative plaque resembling the number plate that had been issued to the prisoner of war.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 420, § 1; 1987, ch. 450, § 1.

39-04-10.6.
Registration of motor vehicles owned by collectors.

A person who owns a motor vehicle that is at least twenty-five years old but that is not eligible for registration under section 39-04-10.4 may register that motor vehicle as a collector’s motor vehicle. The motor vehicle is eligible for collector’s registration if it is owned and operated solely as a collector’s item and if the owner owns another motor vehicle the owner uses for general transportation. A motor vehicle qualifies as a collector’s item under this section only if it is operated on public streets and highways for the purpose of driving the vehicle to and from active entry and participation in parades, car shows, car rallies, other public gatherings held for the purpose of displaying or selling the vehicle, and to and from service or storage facilities. An applicant for registration of a vehicle as a collector’s motor vehicle shall file an affidavit with the director that states the owner’s name and address, the make, year, and the manufacturer’s identification number of the motor vehicle, and a statement that the motor vehicle is owned and operated solely as a collector’s item and not for general transportation purposes. If the director is satisfied that the affidavit is true and correct, the director shall register the motor vehicle as a collector’s motor vehicle on the payment of a registration fee of sixty dollars. The registration is valid as long as the collector’s motor vehicle is owned by the person who applied for the registration under this section. The director shall design and issue distinctive number plates for collector’s motor vehicles registered under this section. In lieu of the distinctive number plates, the owner of the motor vehicle, at the discretion of the director, may display on the motor vehicle number plates from the year in which the motor vehicle was manufactured. The number plates from the year of manufacture may not be used in lieu of distinctive number plates when it would create a duplication of a number in the recordkeeping system of the department. Number plates from the year of manufacture must be legible and must be restored to the satisfaction of the department. A person violating this section or a department rule regarding this section forfeits the right to the registration provided in this section and any registration fees that have been paid.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 452, § 1; 1997, ch. 327, § 1.

39-04-10.7.
Special number plates for farm vehicles.

The director shall issue, without an additional charge, upon application and payment of the registration fee, special number plates or validation decals making them distinctly different from other number plates, to any person registering a truck or combination of trucks and trailers as a farm vehicle under section 39-04-19. The director shall determine the form and size of the special number plates or validation decals and shall adopt rules governing the issuance of these special number plates or validation decals.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 455, § 2.

39-04-10.8.
National guard number plates.

The director, in cooperation with the adjutant general, shall issue distinctive number plates to members of the national guard. A plate issued under this section must bear the national guard insignia designated by the adjutant general and the letters “NG” before the number. The director may issue the plates to the owner of a passenger motor vehicle, a truck the registered gross weight of which does not exceed twenty thousand pounds [9071.84 kilograms], or a motorcycle. On request of the director, the adjutant general shall certify those members of the national guard eligible to receive the plates. On payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of the motor vehicle, and payment of an additional fee of not more than five dollars to cover the cost of issuing the distinctive number plates, the applicant is entitled to issuance of the distinctive number plates. A registrant is eligible for distinctive number plates under this section if the registrant is a member of the national guard or if the registrant has retired from the national guard after twenty years or more of military service. On termination of the registrant’s eligibility, the registrant shall return the distinctive number plates to the director, who shall reissue for a fee of not more than five dollars another number plate to which that registrant is entitled under this chapter. The director and adjutant general shall cooperate in establishing procedures to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 403, § 1; 2009, ch. 322, § 1; 2013, ch. 263, § 4.

39-04-10.9.
Law enforcement plates.

Upon request, the department shall issue identical plates that contain the word “SHERIFF” for the vehicles used and owned by a sheriff’s department and the word “POLICE” for the motor vehicles used and owned by a city’s police department. The plates must be in black letters and on the designed background in use at the time of issuance. The plates must be provided at actual cost. Notwithstanding section 39-04-11, the plates are the property of the law enforcement agency to which issued. At an appropriate time, replacement of the plates must occur whenever the designed background used by the state changes. Notwithstanding section 39-04-11, a motor vehicle that displays a plate under this section must have a clearly visible distinctive identification number on the rear of the vehicle assigned by the appropriate law enforcement agency.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 328, § 1.

39-04-10.10.
North Dakota veterans’ number plates.

The director may issue distinctive number plates to individuals eligible for interment in the North Dakota veterans’ cemetery. The director shall issue a number plate under this section upon receiving:

Payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of a motor vehicle;

Payment of an initial fee of fifteen dollars of which ten dollars is to be deposited in the highway tax distribution fund and five dollars is to be deposited in the veterans’ cemetery maintenance fund unless for a plate issued to a veteran who has been awarded the purple heart, then there is not an initial fee; and

Verification of subsequent payments of an annual surcharge of ten dollars paid to the adjutant general unless for a plate issued to a veteran who has been awarded the purple heart, then there is not an annual surcharge.

The department shall collect the fees and the ten dollar surcharge under this section. The department shall report to the legislative assembly on the funds collected under this section during each legislative session. The department shall pay the funds collected under subdivisions b and c of subsection 1 to the adjutant general monthly, who then, within ten days of receipt of the funds, shall deposit five dollars of each initial fee in the veterans’ cemetery maintenance fund and the ten dollar surcharge shall be divided with five dollars being deposited in the veterans’ cemetery trust fund and five dollars being deposited in the veterans’ cemetery maintenance fund in the state treasury. Investment of the fund is the responsibility of the state treasurer who shall have full authority to invest the fund only in the same manner as the state investment board is authorized to make investments. At the request of the adjutant general, the interest in the veterans’ cemetery trust fund must be deposited in the veterans’ cemetery maintenance fund for the purpose of funding salaries and maintenance of the veterans’ cemetery.

The veterans’ cemetery trust fund may accept funds from private and federal sources.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 329, § 2; 2001, ch. 332, § 1; 2007, ch. 319, § 1; 2015, ch. 261, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 261, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

39-04-10.11.
Firefighter’s association plates.

The director, in cooperation with the North Dakota firefighter’s association, shall design a decorative decal that contains an insignia representing service in the pursuit of firefighting and which is to be placed on a distinctive number plate. On payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of the motor vehicle, and payment of an additional annual fee of fifteen dollars for deposit in the highway fund, the applicant is entitled to issuance of the decals and plates. However, the director may not issue the decal and plates to the owner of a passenger motor vehicle or a truck the registered gross weight of which exceeds twenty thousand pounds [9071.84 kilograms]. A registrant is eligible for distinctive number plates under this section if the registrant is a member of the North Dakota firefighter’s association. On request of the director, the North Dakota firefighter’s association shall certify those members of the North Dakota firefighter’s association eligible to receive the decals and plates. On termination of the registrant’s eligibility, the registrant shall return the decals and plates to the director, who shall reissue for a fee of not more than five dollars another number plate to which that registrant is entitled under this chapter. The director and the North Dakota firefighter’s association shall cooperate in establishing procedures to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 333, § 1; 2009, ch. 322, § 2; 2011, ch. 267, § 1.

39-04-10.12.
North Dakota future farmers of America foundation number plates.

The director shall design a decorative decal that contains the insignia of the North Dakota FFA foundation to be placed on a distinctive number plate. On payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of the motor vehicle and payment of an additional fee of ten dollars, the applicant is entitled to issuance of the decals and plates. However, the director may not issue the decals and plates to the owner of a passenger motor vehicle or a truck the registered gross weight of which exceeds twenty thousand pounds [9071.84 kilograms].

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 309, § 1; 2009, ch. 322, § 3; 2011, ch. 267, § 2.

39-04-10.13.
Public or nonprofit organization number plate.

The director shall develop an organization number plate program for distinctive number plates for qualifying public and for nonprofit organizations recognized by the internal revenue service as tax exempt under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3). When appropriate, the department shall design a distinctive number plate to minimize the changes to a single application of overlay on the left side of the number plate. The organization may submit a design for the distinctive number plate for approval by the director. Upon approval by the director and proper application with proof of a minimum of fifty applicants and a one-time payment of one thousand five hundred dollars for a certain organization’s number plate, the director shall include the number plate in the organization number plate program.

The following organizations do not qualify for an organization number plate: out-of-state colleges and universities; groups within high schools, junior colleges, universities, and technical schools, including individual boosters, athletic boosters, and similar groups; unions; political organizations; religious organizations; groups that promote racial or social disharmony; and public offices.

Upon proper application for a plate in the organization number plate program and payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of the motor vehicle and payment of an additional annual fee of twenty-five dollars, a qualified applicant is entitled to issuance of a certain organization number plate. However, the director may not issue the plates to the owner of a passenger motor vehicle or a truck the registered gross weight of which exceeds twenty thousand pounds [9071.85 kilograms].

The director shall deposit ten dollars of the additional organization number plate fee in the highway tax distribution fund and transfer monthly fifteen dollars to the proper organization to support programs of that organization.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 325, § 1; 2007, ch. 320, § 1; 2009, ch. 322, § 4; 2011, ch. 267, § 3.

39-04-10.14.
North Dakota gold star number plates.

The director may issue distinctive number plates to a surviving spouse, parent, including stepmother, stepfather, parent through adoption, and foster parent who stands or stood in loco parentis, grandparents, child, including stepchild and child through adoption, and sibling, including half-brother and half-sister, of a member of the armed forces of the United States who died while serving on active duty during a time of military conflict. The director shall issue a number plate under this section upon receiving payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of a motor vehicle.

Plates issued under this section must bear a gold star emblem logo on the left side of the plate and the letters “GS” before the number. The director shall cooperate with the director of the department of veterans’ affairs to design the gold star emblem logo. The director may issue one set of plates per eligible owner of a passenger motor vehicle or a truck the registered gross weight of which does not exceed twenty thousand pounds [9071.85 kilograms].

On request of the director, the department of veterans’ affairs shall certify those surviving family members of deceased members of the United States armed forces listed above as eligible to receive the plates.

Once declared eligible for a gold star plate, the department may not remove the eligibility of a surviving family member.

Once a plate number is issued to an eligible family member, the department may not assign the plate to another eligible person.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 323, § 1; 2013, ch. 284, § 2.

39-04-10.15.
Patriotic number plates.

The director shall issue patriotic plates under this section upon receiving:

Payment of all other fees required under this chapter for registration of a motor vehicle;

Payment of an initial fee of twenty-five dollars of which twenty dollars is deposited in the highway tax distribution fund and five dollars is deposited in the veterans’ postwar trust fund; and

Payment of an annual surcharge of twenty-five dollars of which ten dollars is deposited in the highway tax distribution fund and fifteen dollars is deposited in the veterans’ postwar trust fund.

The department shall collect the initial fees and the annual surcharges under this section. Deposits in the veterans’ postwar trust fund under this section must be added to the principal of the fund. Investment of the fund is the responsibility of the state treasurer who shall have full authority to invest the fund only in the same manner as the state investment board is authorized to make investments.

Patriotic plates must include a flag of the United States decal plate, bald eagle decal plate, or boonie stomper decal plate.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 262, S.L. 2015 provides,

“EFFECTIVE DATE.

This Act becomes effective for the issuance of United States flag and bald eagle plates on July 1, 2017, and for the issuance of boonie stomper plates on August 1, 2016.”

39-04-10.16.
Special vehicle license plates for volunteer emergency responders and volunteer firefighters. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Fire department” means a certified city fire department, certified rural fire department, or certified fire protection district that has filed a certificate of existence under section 18-04-02.

“Volunteer emergency responder” means an emergency medical services provider certified by the state department of health and the individual’s squad leader for a continuous period exceeding two years and who receives an annual compensation of less than ten thousand dollars.

“Volunteer firefighter” means an active member in good standing with a North Dakota fire department who has had a continuous membership for a period exceeding two years and receives an annual compensation of less than ten thousand dollars from the fire department.

Upon application, the director shall issue red personalized plates to volunteer emergency responders and volunteer firefighters at no initial or annual cost to the volunteers. Qualified applicants are eligible to receive one set of plates. Plates may not be displayed on a vehicle with a registered gross weight exceeding twenty thousand pounds [9071.85 kilograms]. The first three digits of the plate are the last three digits of the zip code where the volunteer’s department is located. The remaining space may contain up to three characters of the volunteer’s choosing. This plate serves as an entrance pass to all North Dakota state parks. In cooperation with the volunteer organizations, the director shall designate qualifications and verification procedures for the plates issued under this section.

On termination of the registrant’s eligibility, the registrant shall return the plates to the director, who shall reissue for a fee of not more than five dollars, and upon payment of applicable registration fees, another number plate to which that registrant is entitled under this chapter.

If a registrant fails to return the plates to the director, the director, upon notification of the registrant’s ineligibility, may revoke the plates and reissue for a fee of not more than five dollars, and upon payment of applicable registration fees, another number plate for which the registrant is entitled under this chapter.

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #4 on general election ballot approved November 6, 2018, effective December 6, 2018.; 2019, ch. 308, § 1, effective April 26, 2019.

Note.

The measure creating

Section 39-04-10.6 was approved by the voters at the general election on November 6, 2018. This measure became effective on December 6, 2018.